apertium-hin.hin.dix
    <pardef n="/होना__vblex_iv">
      <e>       <p><l>होगा</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगा</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगी</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होंगी</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगा</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगा</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगी</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगी</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगा</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होंगे</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगी</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होंगी</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होनेवाला</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होनेवाले</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होनेवाली</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होनेवाली</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होना</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होनी</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होने</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होऊँ</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>हुये</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुए</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>बोले</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हो</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>हुये</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुए</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>हुये</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुए</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>हुये</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुए</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हो</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हो</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होता</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होते</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होती</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होती</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होकर</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>होके</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुआ</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>हुये</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुए</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>हुयी</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुई</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>हुयीं</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुईं</l><r>होना<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="सटा हो"><i>सटा<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="पीड़ित हो"><i>पीड़ित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="उपयुक्त हो"><i>उपयुक्त<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="प्रकट हो"><i>प्रकट<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="उदय हो"><i>उदय<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="जमा हो"><i>जमा<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="उपस्थित हो"><i>उपस्थित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="उचित हो"><i>उचित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="काला हो"><i>काला<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="असफल हो"><i>असफल<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="तेज़ हो"><i>तेज़<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="उभरा हो"><i>उभरा<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="विस्फोट हो"><i>विस्फोट<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="बढकर हो"><i>बढकर<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ढला हो"><i>ढला<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="क़ैद हो"><i>क़ैद<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="भरा हो"><i>भरा<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="जरुरत हो"><i>जरुरत<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="उँचा हो"><i>उँचा<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="जमा हो"><i>जमा<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="व्यावसायिक हो"><i>व्यावसायिक<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="गर्भवती हो"><i>गर्भवती<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="समाप्त हो"><i>समाप्त<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="राजी हो"><i>राजी<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="जारी हो"><i>जारी<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="परिवर्तित हो"><i>परिवर्तित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="जरूरत हो"><i>जरूरत<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="बना हो"><i>बना<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="इकट्ठा हो"><i>इकट्ठा<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="कुंचित हो"><i>कुंचित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="चकित हो"><i>चकित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="कम हो"><i>कम<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="आवश्यकता हो"><i>आवश्यकता<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="आश्रित हो"><i>आश्रित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="बरबाड हो"><i>बरबाड<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="खत्म हो"><i>खत्म<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ढालू हो"><i>ढालू<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="अलग हो"><i>अलग<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="शुद्ध हो"><i>शुद्ध<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="बरबाद हो"><i>बरबाद<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="क्षीण हो"><i>क्षीण<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="मंत्रमुग्ध हो"><i>मंत्रमुग्ध<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="दाखिल हो"><i>दाखिल<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="विकसित हो"><i>विकसित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="समाप्त हो"><i>समाप्त<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="कम हो"><i>कम<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="अनुत्तीर्ण हो"><i>अनुत्तीर्ण<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="विनष्ट हो"><i>विनष्ट<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="परास्त हो"><i>परास्त<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="कम हो"><i>कम<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="भ्रष्ट हो"><i>भ्रष्ट<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ज्ञात हो"><i>ज्ञात<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="संगत हो"><i>संगत<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="प्रचलित हो"><i>प्रचलित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ज़री हो"><i>ज़री<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="रूढ़िवादी हो"><i>रूढ़िवादी<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="चिंतित हो"><i>चिंतित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="इक्कट्ठा हो"><i>इक्कट्ठा<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="भरमार हो"><i>भरमार<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ख़राब हो"><i>ख़राब<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="दुःखित हो"><i>दुःखित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="घटित हो"><i>घटित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="विकसित हो"><i>विकसित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="निमन्त्रक हो"><i>निमन्त्रक<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="अंकित हो"><i>अंकित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="प्रेरित हो"><i>प्रेरित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="जुड़ा हो"><i>जुड़ा<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="चिढ़ हो"><i>चिढ़<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="संलग्न हो"><i>संलग्न<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="प्रसन्न हो"><i>प्रसन्न<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="उत्तेजित हो"><i>उत्तेजित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="आगे हो"><i>आगे<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ऊँचा हो"><i>ऊँचा<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="भर हो"><i>भर<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="देशप्रेम हो"><i>देशप्रेम<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="सफल हो"><i>सफल<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ढेर हो"><i>ढेर<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="गुथा हो"><i>गुथा<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="पूरा हो"><i>पूरा<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="परिवर्तित हो"><i>परिवर्तित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="चिढ़ हो"><i>चिढ़<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="खत्म हो"><i>खत्म<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="सदृशता हो"><i>सदृशता<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="पास हो"><i>पास<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="मालिक हो"><i>मालिक<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="हित हो"><i>हित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="पास हो"><i>पास<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="दुःखी हो"><i>दुःखी<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="शान्त हो"><i>शान्त<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="खड़े हो"><i>खड़े<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="पक्का हो"><i>पक्का<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="प्रचार हो"><i>प्रचार<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="खराब हो"><i>खराब<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="शुरू हो"><i>शुरू<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ताज्जुब हो"><i>ताज्जुब<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="परिवर्तित हो"><i>परिवर्तित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="पुनर्जीवित हो"><i>पुनर्जीवित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="विधुर हो"><i>विधुर<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="काफ़ी हो"><i>काफ़ी<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="दुःखी हो"><i>दुःखी<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="टंकारित हो"><i>टंकारित<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="नफ़रत हो"><i>नफ़रत<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="भूखा हो"><i>भूखा<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="लेखक हो"><i>लेखक<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="जगह हो"><i>जगह<b/></i><par n="/होना__vblex_iv"/></e>
